Massachusetts, session 194th, H464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting the
following section:-
Section 245. (a) As used in this section, “gas stove” means a household natural gas stove
or range that is used for indoor food preparation and provides at least one of the following
functions: (i) surface cooking; (ii) oven cooking; or (iii) broiling.
(b) No person shall sell, attempt to sell, or offer to sell to a consumer in the
commonwealth a gas stove that is manufactured on or after January 1, 2026 unless a label on the
gas stove bears the message:
“WARNING: Gas stoves can release nitrogen dioxide and carbon monoxide inside
homes at levels exceeding the Environmental Protection Agency’s standards for outdoor air
quality. The presence of these pollutants may exacerbate pre-existing respiratory illnesses or lead
of 2

to the development of asthma, especially in children. Gas stoves may also release other
pollutants, including benzene and formaldehyde.”
Manufacturers or importers shall affix adhesive labels to the gas stove in a position that is
easily read by a consumer examining the product. The label must be in a type size no smaller
than the largest type size used for other consumer information on the product.
(c) (1) A sign or poster shall be displayed conspicuously at the premises on which the
sale of a gas stove takes place bearing the message required by subsection (b) of this section.
Such sign or poster must have conspicuous lettering in at least 72-point bold face type, except
that the word “WARNING” shall be in at least two-inch lettering. Such sign or poster shall be
placed as close as possible to the place where gas stoves are displayed for sale so that it is
noticeable and easily read able by a consumer examining any displayed gas stoves for sale.
(2) If the sale of a gas stove takes place on the Internet, a notice shall be posted in a
conspicuous location on the web page on which the gas stove is listed for sale, bearing the
message required by subsection (b) of this section.
(d) A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall be considered an unfair or
deceptive act or practice under chapter 93A. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted under
said chapter 93A shall be available for the enforcement of this section.
(e) The department may adopt regulations regarding the placement and format of labels,
signs, and posters to comply with this section.
of 2